Hawaii statutes.
[§432E-41] External review reporting
requirements. (a) An independent review organization assigned pursuant to
this part to conduct an external review shall maintain written records in the
aggregate by state and by health carrier on all requests for external review
for which it conducted an external review during a calendar year and upon
request shall submit a report to the commissioner, as required under subsection
(b).

(b) Each independent review organization
required to maintain written records on all requests for external review
pursuant to subsection (a) for which it was assigned to conduct an external
review shall submit to the commissioner, upon request, a report in the format
specified by the commissioner. The report shall include in the aggregate by
state, and for each health carrier:

(1) The total number of requests for external review;

(2) The number of requests for external review
resolved and, of those resolved, the number resolved upholding the adverse
action and the number resolved reversing the adverse action;

(3) The average length of time for resolution;

(4) The summary of the types of coverages or cases
for which an external review was sought, as provided in the format required by
the commissioner;

(5) The number of external reviews that were
terminated as the result of a reconsideration by the health carrier of its
adverse action after the receipt of additional information from the enrollee or
the enrollee's appointed representative; and

(6) Any other information the commissioner may
request or require.

The independent review organization shall
retain the written records required pursuant to this subsection for at least
three years.

(c) Each health carrier shall maintain written
records in the aggregate, by state and for each type of health benefit plan
offered by the health carrier on all requests for external review that the
health carrier receives notice of from the commissioner pursuant to this part.

Each health carrier required to maintain
written records on all requests for external review shall submit to the
commissioner, upon request, a report in the format specified by the
commissioner that includes in the aggregate, by state, and by type of health
benefit plan:

(1) The total number of requests for external review;

(2) From the total number of requests for external
review reported, the number of requests determined eligible for a full external
review; and

(3) Any other information the commissioner may
request or require.

The health carrier shall retain the written records
required pursuant to this subsection for at least three years. [L 2011, c 230,
pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next